Arkansas, session 2025, SB458.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 9-27-318(g), concerning what a court is
required to consider in a hearing on the transfer of a delinquency matter to
a criminal division of circuit court, is amended to read as follows:
(g) In the transfer hearing, the court shall consider all of the
following factors:
(1) The seriousness of the alleged offense and whether the
protection of society requires prosecution in the criminal division of
circuit court;
(2) Whether the alleged offense was committed in an aggressive,
violent, premeditated, or willful manner;
(3) Whether the offense was against a person or property, with
*LJH184*
04-09-2025 11:39:30 LJH184

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 H4/9/25 SB458
greater weight being given to offenses against persons, especially if
personal injury resulted;
(4) The culpability of the juvenile, including the level of
planning and participation in the alleged offense;
(5) The previous history of the juvenile, including whether the
juvenile had been adjudicated a juvenile offender and, if so, whether the
offenses were against persons or property, and any other previous history of
antisocial behavior or patterns of physical violence;
(6) The sophistication or maturity of the juvenile as determined
by consideration of the juvenile's home, environment, emotional attitude,
pattern of living, or desire to be treated as an adult;
(7) Whether there are facilities or programs available to the
judge of the juvenile division of circuit court that are likely to
rehabilitate the juvenile before the expiration of the juvenile's twenty-
first birthday;
(8) Whether the juvenile acted alone or was part of a group in
the commission of the alleged offense;
(9) Written reports, and other materials, and any other
information relating to the juvenile's mental, physical, educational, and
social history, including without limitation exposure to adverse childhood
experiences, childhood trauma, involvement in the child welfare or foster
care systems, status as a victim of human trafficking, sexual abuse, or rape;
and
(10) Any other factors deemed relevant by the judge.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 9-27-503(c)(9), concerning a court's
findings and consideration of written reports and materials relating to a
juvenile's mental, physical, educational, and social history as a factor in
deciding to designate a juvenile as an extended juvenile jurisdiction
offender, is amended to read as follows:
(9) Written reports, and other materials, and any other
information relating to the juvenile's mental, physical, educational, and
social history, including without limitation exposure to adverse childhood
experiences, childhood trauma, involvement in the child welfare or foster
care systems, status as a victim of human trafficking, sexual abuse, or rape;
and
04-09-2025 11:39:30 LJH184

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 H4/9/25 SB458
SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 16, Chapter 90, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
16-90-124. Sentencing of juvenile or person convicted for offense
committed as juvenile — Factors.
If a person is convicted for an offense that the person committed when
he or she was less than eighteen (18) years of age, the court shall, in
addition to any other factors that the court is required to consider before
imposing a sentence upon the person, consider the following:
(1) The exposure of the juvenile or person who committed the
offense as a juvenile to adverse childhood experiences or childhood trauma,
involvement in the child welfare or foster care systems, status as a victim
of human trafficking, sexual abuse, or rape, and the impact of trauma on the
juvenile's behavior; and
(2) The differences between a juvenile offender and an adult
offender, including without limitation the diminished culpability of a
juvenile as compared to that of an adult and the typical characteristics of
youth.

/s/G. Leding

















04-09-2025 11:39:30 LJH184